Utah statutes.
53B-16-501.   Nonprofit corporations or foundations -- Purpose.

(1)  Dixie State University may form a nonprofit corporation or foundation controlled by the president of the college and the Board of Regents to aid and assist the college in attaining its charitable, communications, and other related educational objectives, including support for the Center for Media Innovation, film festivals, film production, print media, broadcasting, television, and digital media.

(2)  The nonprofit corporation or foundation may receive and administer legislative appropriations, government grants, contracts, and private gifts to carry out its public purposes.



Amended by Chapter 10, 2013 General Session

